District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Utility Disconnection Protection Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “Disability” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 404(4) of the
Disability Rights Protection Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-239; D.C.
Official Code § 2-1431.01(4)).
(2) “Electric company” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 8 of
An Act Making appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of the District of
Columbia for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred and fourteen, and for other
purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 976; D.C. Official Code § 34-207).
(3) “Eligible customer” means a utility customer that:
(A) Has notified the utility provider of an inability to pay all or a portion


of the amount due; and
(B) Agrees in writing to make payments in accordance with the payment
plan.
(4) "Gas company" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3(11) of
the Retail Natural Gas Supplier Licensing and Consumer Protection Act of 2004, effective
March 16, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-227; D.C. Official Code § 34-1671.02(11)).
(5) “Protected household” means a household that includes a resident who is:
(A) An elderly person 65 years of age or older;
(B) A child under 18 years of age;
(C) An individual with a disability;
(D) An individual who is pregnant or up to 12 weeks postpartum; or,
(E) A recipient of any of the following public assistance programs:
(i) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, established under
part A of title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.);
(ii) the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, established
under the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq.);
(iii) the supplemental security income program established under
Title XVI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1381 et seq.);
(iv) Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program;
(v) Any other income-based assistance program identified by the
Mayor.
(6) “Protected months” means May 15 through September 15 and November 1
through February 29 of each calendar year.


(7) “Utility provider” means an electric company or a gas company.
Sec. 3. Shutoff prohibition.
(a) A utility provider shall not disconnect residential service for non-payment for any
protected household during the protected months.
(b) The Department of Energy and Environment (“DOEE”) shall establish a process for
verification of program eligibility and proof of residency.
(c) DOEE shall transmit certification of program eligibility to a utility provider on behalf
of a protected household within 15 days after verifying eligibility.
(d) Protected households shall recertify program eligibility annually.
(e) A utility provider shall provide information on all monthly bills about the prohibitions
established by this section, along with information about how to apply for assistance with DOEE.
(f) A utility provider shall:
(1) Waive any late fee, interest, or penalty that arises during protected months;
and,
(2) Not sell any uncollected household debt accrued during the protected months
to collection agencies.
Sec. 4. Payment plan.
(a) A utility provider shall offer a payment plan program ("program") for eligible
customers. Under its program, a utility provider shall:
(1) Make a payment plan available to an eligible customer for the payment of
amounts that come due during the program period, with a minimum term length of 2 years,
unless a shorter time period is requested by the eligible customer;
(2) Waive any fee, interest, or penalty that arises out of the eligible customer


entering into a payment plan;
(3) Not report to a credit reporting agency as delinquent the amounts subject to
the payment plan;
(4) Notify all customers of the availability, terms, and application process for its
program; and
(5) Reconnect service to occupied residential property when an eligible
customer enters a payment plan, and not charge a fee greater than $15 for this reconnection.
(b)(1) Customers entering into a payment plan shall be required to make payments in
monthly installments for the duration of the payment plan unless a shorter payment schedule is
requested by the customer.
(2) A utility provider shall permit a customer that has entered into a payment
plan to pay an amount greater than the monthly amount established in the payment plan.
(3) A utility provider shall not require or request a customer to provide a lump-
sum payment under a payment plan.
(4) A utility provider shall provide confirmation in writing to the customer of the
payment plan entered into, including the terms of a payment plan.
(5) For eligible customers who are also protected households, the monthly
minimum amount established in the payment plan may not exceed 6% of the eligible customer’s
monthly income.
(c) A utility provider shall utilize existing procedures or, if necessary, establish new
procedures, subject to approval by the Public Service Commission (“Commission”), to provide a
process by which a customer may apply for a payment plan, which may include requiring the


customer to submit supporting documentation. A utility provider shall establish a payment plan
application process either online or by telephone.
(d)(1) A utility provider shall approve each application for a payment plan made by an
eligible customer.
(2) If the customer is not eligible and the customer's application for a payment
plan is denied, the utility provider shall inform the customer, in writing, of the denial and of the
option to file a written complaint pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.
(e)(1) When a customer fails to pay in full the amounts due under a payment plan
on 3 separate occasions during the term of such payment plan, and the customer and utility
provider have not mutually agreed to a modification of the terms of the payment plan, nothing
100 under this section shall prevent a utility provider from either offering the customer a new
101 payment plan or disconnecting service.
102 (2) Notwithstanding any provision in this section, a utility provider is not
103 required to offer a customer a new payment plan within one year from when a customer has
104 failed to pay in full the amount due under a payment plan offered pursuant to this section on 3
105 separate occasions
106 (f)(1) A utility provider that receives an application for a payment plan pursuant to this
107 section shall retain the application, whether approved or denied, for at least 3 years.
108 (2) Upon request by the customer, a utility provider shall make an application for
109 a payment plan available to the Commission, and the Office of the People’s Counsel;
110 (g) A customer whose application for a payment plan is denied may file a written
111 complaint with the Commission, and the Office of the People's Counsel.
112 Sec. 5. Reporting Requirements.


113 (a) A utility provider shall collect and report the following arrearage and
114 disconnection data to the Public Service Commission on a monthly basis, disaggregated by Ward
115 and by nine-digit zip code:
116 (1) The number of:
117 (A) Residential customers;
118 (B) Low-income residential customers;
119 (C) Residential customers in arrears and the total dollar amount of
120 those arrearages;
121 (D) Low-income customers in arrears and the total dollar amount of
122 their arrearages;
123 (E) Residential terminations for non-payment;
124 (F) Low-income residential terminations for non-payment;
125 (G) Low-income residential service arrearage-related restorations;
126 (H) Residential service arrearage-related restorations;
127 (2) The amount of low-income residential accounts determined
128 uncollectible;
129 (3) The total dollar amount of residential accounts determined uncollectible;
130 (4) The number of disconnection notices issued to residential customers;
131 (5) The number of disconnection notices issued to low-income residential
132 customers:
133 (6) Total revenues from residential customers and total revenues from low-income
134 residential customers;


135 (7) The number of low-income deferred payment agreements entered into each
136 month and the total dollar amount associated with each low-income deferred payment
137 agreement;
138 (8) The number of residential deferred payment agreements entered into each
139 month and the total dollar amount associated with each residential deferred payment agreement;
140 (9) The average length of repayment terms for residential customers in deferred
141 payment agreements;
142 (10) the average length of repayment terms for low-income customers in deferred
143 payment agreements;
144 (11) The number of residents eligible for and, separately, enrolled in the Utility
145 Aid Discount Program, Residential Aid Discount Program, and Residential Essential Service;
146 and,
147 (12) The number of residents who became eligible for disconnection due to non-
148 payment but weren’t disconnected due to medical protections, temperature-based protections, or
149 protected household protections.
150 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
151 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
152 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
153 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
154 Sec. 7. Effective date.
155 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
156 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
157 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December


158 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
159 Columbia Register.